Maryland, session 2026, HB1504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
8–630.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Municipal corporation” means a municipality as defined in § 1–101 of
the Local Government Article.
(3) “Urban highway” means a highway, other than an expressway, that is:
(i) 1. Constructed with a curb and gutter and an enclosed type
storm drainage system;
2. Located in an urban area and on which is located a public
facility that creates appreciable pedestrian traffic along the highway from adjacent areas;
– 1 –

Ch. 418 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. Located within urban boundaries as defined by the U.S.
Census Bureau; or
4. Located within the boundaries of a municipal corporation;
and
(ii) Part of the State highway system.
(b) (1) Sidewalks shall be constructed at the time of construction or
reconstruction of an urban highway, or in response to the request of a local government
unless:
(i) The Administration determines that the cost or impacts of
constructing the sidewalks would be too great in relation to the need for them or their
probable use; or
(ii) The local government indicates that there is no need for
sidewalks.
(2) Sidewalks constructed under this section shall be consistent with area
master plans and transportation plans adopted by the local planning commission.
(c) (1) If sidewalks or bicycle pathways are constructed or reconstructed as
part of a roadway construction or reconstruction project, the Administration shall fund the
sidewalk or bicycle pathway construction or reconstruction as a part of the cost of the
roadway project.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, if
sidewalks or bicycle pathways are constructed or reconstructed in response to a request
from a local government IN ITS ANNUAL PRIORITY LETTER FOR THE DEPARTMENT’S
CONSIDERATION FOR INCLUSION IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM UNDER § 2–103.1 OF THIS ARTICLE and the adjacent roadway is not being
concurrently constructed or reconstructed, the cost to construct or reconstruct the sidewalk
or bicycle pathway shall be shared equally between the State and local governments.
(3) If sidewalks or bicycle pathways within a sustainable community as
defined in § 6–301 of the Housing and Community Development Article are constructed or
reconstructed in response to a request from a local government IN ITS ANNUAL PRIORITY
LETTER FOR THE DEPARTMENT’S CONSIDERATION FOR INCLUSION IN THE
CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM UNDER § 2–103.1 OF THIS ARTICLE
and the adjacent roadway is not being concurrently constructed or reconstructed, the cost
to construct or reconstruct the sidewalk or bicycle pathway may be funded entirely by the
State.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 418
(4) (i) This paragraph does not apply to a priority funding area that is
a sustainable community as defined in § 6–301 of the Housing and Community
Development Article.
(ii) IN DETERMINING FUNDING FOR THE CONSTRUCTION AND
RECONSTRUCTION OF SIDEWALKS AND BICYCLE PATHWAYS UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH FROM THE FUNDING PROGRAMMED FOR SIDEWALKS AND BICYCLE
PATHWAYS BY THE DEPARTMENT IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM UNDER § 2–103.1 OF THIS ARTICLE, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL
PRIORITIZE FUNDING FOR SIDEWALKS AND BICYCLE PATHWAYS THAT ARE, OR ARE
ADJACENT TO HIGHWAYS THAT ARE, SUBJECT TO:
1. A COMPLETE STREETS POLICY, AS DEFINED IN §
2–112 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
2. ANOTHER SIMILAR VISION ZERO PROGRAM UNDER
SUBTITLE 10 OF THIS TITLE.
(III) If sidewalks or bicycle pathways within an area designated as a
priority funding area under § 5–7B–02 of the State Finance and Procurement Article are
constructed or reconstructed in response to a request from a local government IN ITS
ANNUAL PRIORITY LETTER FOR THE DEPARTMENT’S CONSIDERATION FOR
INCLUSION IN THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM UNDER § 2–103.1
OF THIS ARTICLE and the adjacent roadway is not being concurrently constructed or
reconstructed, and if the Administration determines that construction would not occur
under this section due to insufficient contribution of funds by the local government, the cost
to construct or reconstruct the sidewalk or bicycle pathway shall be shared between the
State and local government as follows:
1. 75 percent of the cost shall be funded by the State; and
2. 25 percent of the cost shall be funded by the local
government.
[(iii)] (IV) If sidewalks or bicycle pathways within an area
designated as a priority funding area under § 5–7B–02 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article are constructed or reconstructed based on a determination by the
Administration that a substantial public safety risk or significant impediment to
pedestrian access exists and the adjacent roadway is not being concurrently constructed or
reconstructed, then:
1. The Administration shall categorize the sidewalk or
bicycle pathway construction project as “system preservation” and give corresponding
funding priority to the project; and
– 3 –

Ch. 418 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. The cost to construct or reconstruct the sidewalk or bicycle
pathway AND TO ACQUIRE THE NECESSARY RIGHT–OF–WAY may be funded entirely by
the State.
(5) If sidewalks or bicycle pathways are being constructed or reconstructed
in response to a request from a local government IN ITS ANNUAL PRIORITY LETTER FOR
THE DEPARTMENT’S CONSIDERATION FOR INCLUSION IN THE CONSOLIDATED
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM UNDER § 2–103.1 OF THIS ARTICLE and the adjacent
roadway is not being concurrently constructed or reconstructed, the local government shall:
(i) Provide public notice and opportunities for community
involvement prior to the construction of a sidewalk or bicycle pathway project; and
(ii) Secure any necessary right–of–way that may be needed beyond
the right–of–way already owned by the State.
(6) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, after
sidewalks and bicycle pathways are constructed under this section, they shall be
maintained and repaired by the political subdivision in which they are located.
(ii) Subject to approval and the availability of funds, the
Administration promptly shall reimburse a political subdivision for the preapproved and
documented costs incurred in reconstructing a segment of a sidewalk or bicycle pathway
that has deteriorated to the extent that repair is not practical or desirable for public safety.
(d) The Administration may not construct any project that will result in the
severance or destruction of an existing major route for pedestrian transportation traffic,
unless the project provides for construction of a reasonable alternative route or such a route
already exists.
(e) The Administration shall develop guidelines jointly with local governments to
carry out the provisions of this section.
(f) The Administration shall maintain and repair all facilities for nighttime
illumination that:
(1) Are constructed by the Administration for the safe conduct of vehicular
traffic; and
(2) Exist adjacent to urban highways.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 4 –